Washington statutes.
RCW 43.41.399

Education technology revolving fund.

(1) The education technology revolving fund is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from billings under subsection (2) of this section must be deposited in the revolving fund. Only the director or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the fund. The revolving fund shall be used to pay for K-20 network operations, transport, equipment, software, supplies, and services, maintenance and depreciation of on-site data, and shared infrastructure, and other costs incidental to the development, operation, and administration of shared educational information technology services, telecommunications, and systems. The revolving fund shall not be used for the acquisition, maintenance, or operations of local telecommunications infrastructure or the maintenance or depreciation of on-premises video equipment specific to a particular institution or group of institutions.

(2) The revolving fund and all disbursements from the revolving fund are subject to the allotment procedure under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures. The office shall, subject to the review and approval of the office of financial management, establish and implement a billing structure for network services identified in subsection (1) of this section.

(3) The office shall charge those public entities connected to the K-20 telecommunications system under RCW 43.41.393 an annual copayment per unit of transport connection as determined by the legislature after consideration of the board's recommendations. This copayment shall be deposited into the revolving fund to be used for the purposes in subsection (1) of this section. It is the intent of the legislature to appropriate to the revolving fund such moneys as necessary to cover the costs for transport, maintenance, and depreciation of data equipment located at the individual public institutions, maintenance and depreciation of the K-20 network backbone, and services provided to the network under RCW 43.41.391.

[ 2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 216; 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 722; 2004 c 276 s 910; 1999 c 285 s 10; 1997 c 180 s 1. Formerly RCW 43.41A.105, 43.105.835, 28D.02.065.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 ss 101-109, 201-224, 406-408, 410, 501-507, 601, and 602: See note following RCW 43.105.007.

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Severability—Effective date—2004 c 276: See notes following RCW 43.330.167.

Effective date—1997 c 180: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [April 23, 1997]." [ 1997 c 180 s 3.]